District of Columbia statutes.
29A-930

Repealed

Expulsion of members; procedure; purchase of holdings.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 486, ch. 397, § 30
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-930.
1981 Ed., § 29-1130.
1973 Ed., § 29-830.